Utah statutes.
17-36-26.5.   Review of second year's budget for biennial budgets.

(1) In a county that has adopted a fiscal period that is a biennial period under Subsection 17-36-3.5(2), the governing body shall, in a public hearing before December 31 of the first year of the biennial period, review the individual budgets of the funds set forth in Sections 17-36-8 and 17-36-32 for the second year of the biennial period.

(2) In each review under Subsection (1), the governing body shall follow the procedures of Sections 17-36-12 and 17-36-13 for holding a public hearing.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 1999 General Session

